South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - South Carolina Real Estate Commission, relating to South Carolina Real Estate Commission, designated as Regulation Document Number 5437, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Real Estate Commission intends to promulgate regulations related to license classification changes, reactivation of inactive licenses, reinstatement of lapsed licenses, written office policies, licensee supervision, advertising, and teams. The proposed regulations will also correct citations and numbering and will remove duplicative regulations. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 26, 2025. ----XX----